Arkansas, session 2025, HB1914.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 13, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-13-266. Operating a commercial motor vehicle without sufficient
English language proficiency.
(a) A person commits the offense of operating a commercial motor
vehicle without sufficient English language proficiency if the person:
(1) Operates a commercial motor vehicle, as defined under 49
C.F.R. 390.5T, as it existed on January 1, 2025, in the state; and
(2) Cannot read or speak the English language sufficiently to:
(A) Converse with the general public;
(B) Understand highway traffic signs and signals in the
English language;
(C) Respond to official inquiries; and
*ZRC106*
03/31/2025 11:56:40 AM ZRC106

HB1914
(D) Make entries on reports and records.
(b) Operating a commercial motor vehicle without sufficient English
language proficiency is a violation subject to a fine under § 23-13-257.

































03/31/2025 11:56:40 AM ZRC106